Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Voluntary Admission to Inpatient Treatment

33-6-201. Persons who may apply for voluntary admission.

The following persons may apply for admission to a public or private hospital or treatment resource for diagnosis, observation and treatment of a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance:

A person who is sixteen (16) years of age or over and who does not lack capacity to apply under § 33-3-218;

A parent, legal custodian, or legal guardian who is acting on behalf of a child;

A conservator whom the appointing court has expressly granted authority to apply for the person's admission to a hospital or treatment resource for mental illness or serious emotional disturbance;

A qualified mental health professional acting on the basis of the terms of the person's declaration for mental health treatment;

A person's attorney in fact under a durable power of attorney for health care, under title 34, chapter 6, part 2;

A caregiver under title 34, chapter 6, part 3, who is acting on behalf of a child; or

An individual acting as an agent under the Tennessee Health Care Decisions Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 11, part 18 or an individual designated as a surrogate under § 68-11-1806(a).

An individual's surrogate as designated under § 68-11-1806(c) may also apply for such admission provided no person may be admitted by a surrogate under this subsection (b) for more than twenty-one (21) consecutive days unless a petition has been filed pursuant to part 5 of this chapter, or unless an individual who meets any of the criteria set out in subdivisions (a)(1)-(7) of this section applies for voluntary admission subsequent to an application by a surrogate for voluntary admission under this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 35; 2004, ch. 565, § 4; 2013, ch. 238, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 33-6-101 — 33-6-111; 33-6-201 — 33-6-209; 33-6-301 — 33-6-306 (Acts 1957, ch. 288, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 37-40, 43, 45, 46; 1967, ch. 44, § 1; 1967, ch. 58, § 1;1973, ch. 127, § 11; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 43, 45, 46, 52, 53; 1975, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 14, 16-18; 1976, ch. 610, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 5; 1976, ch. 764, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 165, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 527, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 621, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 445, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(21); 1981, ch. 536, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 1, 3-11; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 8, 9, 11, 13, 14, 17-22, 24; T.C.A., § 33-314, 33-325, 33-603, 33-601, 33-604, 33-606 — 33-609, 33-614 — 33-619; 33-379 — 33-381, 33-1301 — 33-1305, 33-3-620 — 33-3-622, 33-6-203 — 33-6-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8, 11-16, 23-25, 27, 28-32, 39, 40; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 14-25; 1985, ch. 478, § 37; Acts 1986, ch. 595, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 836, §§ 4, 6; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1-5; 1988, ch 953, § 8; 1989, ch. 99, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 3, 15-17; 1990, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 15, 16; 1993, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 676, § 1; 1994, ch. 779, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 57-66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

Family support programs and services, title 33, ch. 5, part 2.

Intellectual disability, voluntary hospitalization, § 33-5-301.

Attorney General Opinions. Release of minor voluntarily admitted to mental health hospital, OAG 88-156, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 157 (8/29/88).

33-6-202. Admission upon finding of need for hospitalization.

Upon application, if an examination by an admitting physician determines the need for hospitalization, the chief officer of a public hospital shall admit and the chief officer of a private hospital or treatment resource may admit the person. If the service recipient is a child, the chief officer shall notify the child's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian of the admission. Admission is subject to the availability of suitable accommodations.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-203. Limitations on admission of child.

No unemancipated child may be admitted under this part for more than one (1) six-month period in any twelve-month period unless the admissions review committee approves further hospitalization.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-204. Admissions review committee — Members — Expenses.

The admissions review committee consists of four (4) persons. Two (2) members shall be appointed from the hospital or treatment resource by the chief officer and two (2) members shall be appointed from the community contiguous to the hospital or treatment resource by the chair of the state commission on children and youth. The members appointed by the chair of the state commission on children and youth shall not be employees or staff members of the hospital or treatment resource. The committee members shall be trained or experienced specifically in child mental health. Committee members shall serve voluntarily, and the hospital or treatment resource shall reimburse them for their travel and per diem living expenses.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-205. Approval of commitment.

The admissions review committee shall approve continued hospitalization by a vote of at least three (3) of its members. The committee may recommend the person's continued hospitalization for a period not to exceed six (6) months. If the committee does not approve continued hospitalization, the person shall be released, unless, prior to the committee's decision, a petition for judicial hospitalization has been filed under chapter 6, part 5 of this title.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-206. Request for release.

The following persons may at any time request the service recipient's release by filing a written application with the chief officer:

An adult service recipient;

A service recipient's conservator;

A service recipient's attorney in fact under a durable power of attorney for health care;

The parent, legal custodian, or legal guardian who applied for the admission of a child;

A child who is sixteen (16) years of age or over and who was admitted on the child's own application;

A caregiver under title 34, chapter 6, part 3, who is acting on behalf of a child; or

An individual acting as an agent under the Tennessee Health Care Decisions Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 11, part 18 or a person's surrogate as designated under title 68, chapter 11, part 18.

If a competent service recipient cannot file a written request, a person acting on the service recipient's behalf may file the request with the service recipient's consent.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 36; 2004, ch. 565, § 5; 2013, ch. 238, § 2.

33-6-207. Procedure for release following request.

If the chief officer receives a request for discharge under § 33-6-206 and does not admit the service recipient under chapter 6, part 4 of this title, the chief officer shall release the service recipient, if a child, within twenty-four (24) hours and, if an adult, within twelve (12) hours after receipt of the request or at the time stated in the request, whichever is later.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-208. Notification of parent, guardian or custodian prior to release of child.

The chief officer shall notify the parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian of a service recipient who is a child, before releasing the child. If the chief officer has reason to believe that the child is likely to be dependent and neglected upon release, then the chief officer shall notify the department of children's services before the release.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.